Utah statutes.
62A-4a-202.6.   Child protective services investigators within the Office of
Attorney General -- Authority.
(1) (a)  In accordance with Section 67-5-16 the attorney general may employ,
with the consent of the division, child protective services investigators to
investigate reports of abuse or neglect of a child that occur while the child
is in the custody of the division.
(b) (i)  The division shall, in accordance with Subsection 62A-4a-409(5),
contract with an independent child protective service investigator to
investigate reports of abuse or neglect of a child that occur while the child
is in the custody of the division.
(ii)  The executive director of the department shall designate an entity
within the department, other than the division, to monitor the contract for
the investigators described in Subsection (1)(b)(i).
(2)  The investigators described in Subsection (1) may also investigate
allegations of abuse or neglect of a child by a department employee or a
licensed substitute care provider.
(3)  The investigators described in Subsection (1), if not peace officers,
shall have the same rights, duties, and authority of a child protective
services investigator employed by the division to:
(a)  make a thorough investigation upon receiving either an oral or written
report of alleged abuse or neglect of a child, with the primary purpose of
that investigation being the protection of the child;
(b)  make an inquiry into the child's home environment, emotional, or mental
health, the nature and extent of the child's injuries, and the child's
physical safety;
(c)  make a written report of their investigation, including determination
regarding whether the alleged abuse or neglect was substantiated,
unsubstantiated, or without merit, and forward a copy of that report to the
division within the time mandates for investigations established by the
division;
(d)  immediately consult with school authorities to verify the child's status
in accordance with Sections 53A-11-101 through 53A-11-103 when a report is
based upon or includes an allegation of educational neglect;
(e)  enter upon public or private premises, using appropriate legal processes,
to investigate reports of alleged abuse or neglect; and
(f)  take a child into protective custody, and deliver the child to a law
enforcement officer, or to the division.  Control and jurisdiction over the
child shall be determined by the provisions of Title 62A, Chapter 4a, Part 2,
Child Welfare Services, Title 78A, Chapter 6, Juvenile Court Act of 1996, and
as otherwise provided by law.
